Nebraska, session 109, LB1008.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1008 LB1008
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-7305 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Act shall apply
to tax year 2024 and each tax year thereafter. The property tax relief
shall be in the form of property tax credits which appear on property tax
statements. Property tax credits granted under the act shall be credited
against the amount of property taxes owed to school districts. The total
amount of property tax relief granted under the act shall be determined
as follows:
(a) For tax year 2024, the minimum amount of relief granted under
the act shall be seven hundred fifty million dollars. For tax year 2025,
the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be seven hundred
eighty million dollars. For tax year 2026, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be eight hundred eight million dollars. For
tax year 2027, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall
be eight hundred thirty-eight million dollars. For tax year 2028, the
minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be eight hundred
seventy million dollars. For tax year 2029, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be nine hundred two million dollars. For tax
year 2030, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be
the minimum amount from the prior tax year plus a percentage increase
equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the total assessed value of
all real property in the state from the prior year to the current year,
as determined by the Department of Revenue, plus an additional seventy-
five million dollars. For tax year 2031 2030 and each tax year
thereafter, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be
the minimum amount of relief from the prior tax year plus a percentage
increase equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the total assessed
value of all real property in the state from the prior year to the
current year, as determined by the Department of Revenue , excluding any
additional relief provided pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this
-2-

LB1008 LB1008
2026 2026
section, with such amount then increased by three percent; and
(b) If money is transferred to the School District Property Tax
Relief Credit Fund pursuant to section 77-4602, such amount shall be
added to the minimum amount required under subdivision (1)(a) of this
section when determining the total amount of relief granted under the act
for the tax year in which the transfer occurs. If no such transfer occurs
in a given tax year, the minimum amount required under subdivision (1)(a)
of this section shall be the total amount of relief granted under the act
for such tax year.
(2) To determine the amount of the property tax credit for each
parcel, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the
county under subsection (4) of this section by the ratio of the school
district taxes levied in the current year on the parcel to the school
district taxes levied in the current year on all real property in the
county. The amount so determined shall be the property tax credit for
that parcel.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for
the property tax credit provided in this section to the extent of any
remaining liability after calculation of the homestead exemption. If the
property tax credit provided in this section results in a property tax
liability on the homestead that is less than zero, the amount of the
credit which cannot be used by the taxpayer shall be returned to the
Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the year the amount disbursed to
the county was disbursed. The Property Tax Administrator shall
immediately credit any funds returned under this subsection to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. Upon the return of any funds
under this subsection, the county treasurer shall electronically file a
report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a form prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds distributed to each
school district in the county in the year the funds were returned and the
-3-

LB1008 LB1008
2026 2026
amount of unused credits returned.
(4) The amount disbursed to each county under this section shall be
equal to the amount available for disbursement under subsection (1) of
this section multiplied by the ratio of the school district taxes levied
in the prior year on all real property in the county to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
state. By September 15, 2024, and by September 15 of each year
thereafter, the Property Tax Administrator shall determine the amount to
be disbursed under this subsection to each county and shall certify such
amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The disbursements to
the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before
January 31 and the second on or before April 1.
(5) After retaining one percent of the amount received under
subsection (4) of this section for costs, the county treasurer shall
disburse the remaining funds, which are credited against the amount of
property taxes owed to school districts, in the same manner as if such
funds had been received in the form of property tax payments for property
taxes owed to school districts, meaning any amounts attributable to
divided taxes pursuant to section 18-2147 of the Community Development
Law shall be remitted to the applicable authority for which such taxes
were divided.
(6) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund shall be
used for purposes of making the disbursements to counties required under
subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-4-